Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 3277, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3277. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall continue
to determine eligibility criteria requirements and standards for
Medicaid recipients.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15740 TJ 01/04/26




Req. No. 15740 Page 1